Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 24. State Central Registry of Child Abuse Reports; Wide Area Telephone Service for Reporting Child Abuse
[Repealed]

§§ 43-24-1 through 43-24-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§43-24-1. [Laws, 1977, ch. 474, § 8]

§§43-24-3,43-21-5. [Laws, 1977, ch. 474, §§ 9, 10; Laws, 1978, ch. 471, § 3]

§§43-24-7,43-24-9. [Laws, 1977, ch. 474, §§ 11, 12]